Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1821
Death during apprehension or custody; notice required; penalty.

(1) Every hospital, emergency care facility, physician, nurse, out-of-hospital emergency care provider, or law enforcement officer shall immediately notify the county coroner in all cases when it appears that an individual has died while being apprehended by or while in the custody of a law enforcement officer or detention personnel.

(2) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1988, LB 676, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1138, § 19;

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 33.